Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Improvements to Juvenile Correctional Facilities

§ 43-27-201.
Division of Youth Services to establish, maintain and operate Adolescent Opportunity Program.

The purpose of this section is to outline and structure a long-range proposal in addition to certain immediate objectives for improvements in the juvenile facilities of the Division of Youth Services of the Mississippi Department of Human Services in order to provide modern and efficient rehabilitation facilities for juvenile offenders in Mississippi, who are committing an increasing percentage of serious and violent crimes.

The Division of Youth Services shall establish, maintain and operate an Adolescent Opportunity Program (AOP) throughout the state, which may include non-Medicaid assistance eligible juveniles. Beginning July 1, 2016, subject to availability of funds appropriated therefor by the Legislature, AOP professional services, salaries, facility offices, meeting rooms and related supplies and equipment may be provided through contract with local mental health or other nonprofit community organizations. Each AOP must incorporate evidence-based practices and positive behavioral intervention that includes two (2) or more of the following elements: academic, tutoring, literacy, mentoring, vocational training, substance abuse treatment, family counseling and anger management. Programs may include, but shall not be limited to, after school and weekend programs, job readiness programs, home detention programs, community service conflict resolution programs, restitution and community service.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 526, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 471, § 7; Laws, 2006, ch. 539, § 6; Laws, 2014, ch. 398, § 12; Laws, 2015, ch. 330, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 43-27-203.
Youth Challenge Program; implementation and administration of program by National Guard; issuance of diplomas to participants meeting High School Equivalency Diploma requirements.

There is created under the Mississippi National Guard a program to be known as the “Youth Challenge Program.” The program shall be an interdiction program designed for children determined to be “at risk” by the National Guard.

The Mississippi National Guard shall implement and administer the Youth Challenge Program and shall promulgate rules and regulations concerning the administration of the program. The National Guard shall prepare written guidelines concerning the nomination and selection process of participants in the program, and such guidelines shall include a list of the factors considered in the selection process.

Participation in the Youth Challenge Program shall be on a voluntary basis. No child may be sentenced by any court to participate in the program; however, a youth court judge may refer the program to a child when, under his determination, such program would be sufficient to meet the needs of the child.

The Mississippi National Guard, under the auspices of the Challenge Academy, may award an adult high school diploma to each participant who meets the requirements for a High School Equivalency Diploma equivalent under the policies and guidelines of the GED Testing Service of the American Council on Education or other high school equivalency exam and any other minimum academic requirements prescribed by the National Guard and Challenge Academy for graduation from the Youth Challenge Program. Participants in the program who do not meet the minimum academic requirements may be awarded a special certificate of attendance. The Mississippi National Guard and the Challenge Academy shall establish rules and regulations for awarding the adult high school diploma and shall prescribe the form for such diploma and the certificate of attendance.

The Mississippi National Guard may accept any available funds that may be used to defray the expenses of the program, including, but not limited to, federal funding, public or private funds and any funds that may be appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 353, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 398, § 13; Laws, 2016, ch. 351, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 5, 2016).

§ 43-27-205.
Local Juvenile Detention Facility Construction, Renovation and Repair Fund; source of funds; purpose of Fund.

There is established in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the “Local Juvenile Detention Facility Construction, Renovation and Repair Fund” which shall be administered by the Department of Public Safety. Such fund shall be used for the purposes established in this section. The Department of Public Safety shall promulgate regulations for the administration of the fund including applications for grants, the awarding of grants and any necessary forms therefor.

The fund shall consist of any monies appropriated by the Legislature, monies from bonds issued for the purposes described in Section 43-27-207(2)(a) and issued under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233, monies provided by any federal or state grants or provided from any public or private source. Any interest which accrues in the fund shall remain in the fund and at the end of the fiscal year any monies remaining in the fund shall not lapse into the General Fund but shall remain in the fund.

The fund shall be used for the following purposes:

To provide grants to local governmental units to construct, repair, remodel, equip, furnish, add to, improve and maintain juvenile detention facilities. Grants shall be awarded on a proportionate basis based on the population of the local governmental unit. Counties and municipalities are encouraged to enter into interlocal agreements and regional agreements to receive grants. Any area which uses this fund for the purposes provided herein shall have a minimum population of twenty-five thousand (25,000) persons residing in the area to be served by a facility.

To reduce existing indebtedness related to juvenile detention facilities of units of government with existing facilities, proposed facilities or facilities under construction.

Any grants made under the provisions of this section shall be made within eighteen (18) months of the effective date of Sections 43-27-201 through 43-27-233.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-207.
Department of Finance and Administration to issue general obligation bonds to provide funds for construction, renovation, repairing, remodeling, equipping, furnishing, adding to or improving juvenile detention facilities; 1994 State Juvenile Detention Facility Construction, Repair and Renovation Fund.

The Department of Finance and Administration, at one (1) time or from time to time, may declare by resolution the necessity for issuance of general obligation bonds of the State of Mississippi to provide funds for construction, repairing, remodeling, equipping, furnishing, adding to, improving and maintaining juvenile detention facilities which shall include temporary and permanent facilities for housing juvenile offenders, a wilderness camp or any other facility used for juvenile detention. Upon the adoption of a resolution by the Department of Finance and Administration, declaring the necessity for the issuance of any part or all of the general obligation bonds authorized by this section, the department shall deliver a certified copy of its resolution or resolutions to the State Bond Commission. Upon receipt of such resolution, the State Bond Commission, in its discretion, may act as the issuing agent, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, and do any and all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of such bonds. The amount of bonds issued under Sections 43-27-201 through 43-27-233 shall not exceed Twenty-one Million One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($21,150,000.00) to provide funds for the purposes hereinabove set forth and to issue and sell bonds in the amount specified.

Out of the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued, funds shall be allocated, except as otherwise provided in subsections (3) and (4), as follows:

LOCAL JUVENILE DETENTION FACILITY CONSTRUCTION, RENOVATION AND REPAIR

Construction, repair, remodeling, equipping, furnishing, adding to, improving and maintaining juvenile detention facilities . . . . .$ 3,650,000.00

OAKLEY AND COLUMBIA TRAINING SCHOOLS

Construction of a one-hundred-fifty-bed, stand alone, medium security juvenile correctional facility for habitual violent male offenders, construction of a one-hundred-bed minimum security juvenile facility for female offenders, an additional, stand alone, fifteen-bed maximum security juvenile correctional facility for female offenders, construction of staff housing facilities, treatment facilities and any other facilities and related construction deemed appropriate by the Bureau of Building, Grounds and Real Property Management . . . . .$15,500,000.00

OAKLEY AND COLUMBIA TRAINING SCHOOLS

Renovation and repair of infrastructure and facilities, including replacement or repair of furnishings and equipment . . . . .$ 2,000,000.00

TOTAL . . . . .$21,150,000.00

It is expressly provided, however, that if any funds of the Fifteen Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($15,500,000.00) provided for Oakley and Columbia Training Schools in subsection (2)(b) of this section remain after the completion of such project, such remaining funds shall be used for renovation and repair at Oakley and Columbia Training Schools in addition to the funds provided in subsection (2)(c) of this section.

A special fund, to be designated the “1994 State Juvenile Detention Facility Construction, Repair and Renovation Fund,” is created within the State Treasury. The fund shall be maintained by the State Treasurer as a separate and special fund, separate and apart from the General Fund of the state, and investment earnings on amounts in the fund shall be deposited into such fund. The expenditure of monies deposited into the fund shall be under the direction of the Department of Finance and Administration, and such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the Department of Finance and Administration. Monies deposited into such fund shall be allocated and disbursed according to subsection (2)(b) and (c) of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 4; Laws, 1997, ch. 494, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 522, § 91, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 15, 1999).

§ 43-27-209.
Payment of principal of and interest on bonds.

The principal of and interest on the bonds authorized under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 shall be payable in the manner provided in this section. Such bonds shall bear such date or dates, be in such denomination or denominations, bear interest at such rate or rates not exceeding the limits set forth in Section 75-17-101, be payable at such place or places within or without the State of Mississippi, shall mature absolutely at such time or times not to exceed twenty (20) years from date of issue, be redeemable before maturity at such time or times and upon such terms, with or without premium, shall bear such registration privileges, and shall be substantially in such form, all as determined by resolution of the State Bond Commission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-211.
Bonds to be signed by State Bond Commission; bonds to be issued as provided in Registered Bond Act.

The bonds authorized under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 shall be signed by the Chairman of the State Bond Commission, or by his facsimile signature, and the official seal of the State Bond Commission shall be affixed thereto, attested by the Secretary of the State Bond Commission. The interest coupons, if any, to be attached to such bonds may be executed by the facsimile signatures of such officers. Whenever any such bonds shall have been signed by the officials designated to sign the bonds who were in office at the time of such signing but who may have ceased to be such officers before the sale and delivery of such bonds, or who may not have been in office on the date such bonds may bear, the signatures of such officers upon such bonds and coupons shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes and have the same effect as if the person so officially signing such bonds had remained in office until their delivery to the purchaser, or had been in office on the date such bonds may bear. However, notwithstanding anything in Sections 43-27-201 through 43-27-233 to the contrary, such bonds may be issued as provided in the Registered Bond Act of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-213.
Bonds and interest coupons to be negotiable instruments; compliance with Uniform Commercial Code not required.

All bonds and interest coupons issued under the provisions of Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 have all the qualities and incidents of negotiable instruments under the provisions of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code, and in exercising the powers granted by Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233, the State Bond Commission shall not be required to and need not comply with the provisions of the Mississippi Uniform Commercial Code.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-215.
Bonds to be issued by State Bond Commission; procedures for issuance.

The State Bond Commission shall act as the issuing agent for the bonds authorized under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233, prescribe the form of the bonds, advertise for and accept bids, issue and sell the bonds so authorized to be sold, pay all fees and costs incurred in such issuance and sale, and do all other things necessary and advisable in connection with the issuance and sale of the bonds. The State Bond Commission may pay the costs that are incident to the sale, issuance and delivery of the bonds authorized under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 from the proceeds derived from the sale of the bonds. The State Bond Commission shall sell such bonds on sealed bids at public sale, and for such price as it may determine to be for the best interest of the State of Mississippi, but no such sale may be made at a price less than par plus accrued interest to the date of delivery of the bonds to the purchaser. All interest accruing on such bonds so issued shall be payable semiannually or annually; however, the first interest payment may be for any period of not more than one (1) year.

Notice of the sale of any such bond shall be published at least one (1) time, not less than ten (10) days before the date of sale, and shall be so published in one or more newspapers published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, and in one or more other newspapers or financial journals with a national circulation, to be selected by the State Bond Commission.

The State Bond Commission, when issuing any bonds under the authority of Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233, may provide that the bonds, at the option of the State of Mississippi, may be called in for payment and redemption at the call price named therein and accrued interest on such date or dates named therein.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-217.
Full faith and credit of State irrevocably pledged.

The bonds issued under the provisions of Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 are general obligations of the State of Mississippi, and for the payment thereof the full faith and credit of the State of Mississippi is irrevocably pledged. If the funds appropriated by the Legislature are insufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as they become due, then the deficiency shall be paid by the State Treasurer from any funds in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated. All such bonds shall contain recitals on their faces substantially covering the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-219.
Issuance of warrants to pay principal and interest on bonds.

The State Treasurer is authorized to certify to the State Fiscal Officer the necessity for warrants, and the State Fiscal Officer is authorized and directed to issue such warrants, in such amounts as may be necessary to pay when due the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on, or the accredited value of, all bonds issued under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233; and the State Treasurer shall forward the necessary amount to the designated place or places of payment of such bonds in ample time to discharge such bonds, or the interest on the bonds, on their due dates.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-221.
Deposit of proceeds of bond sales into Juvenile Justice Assistance Fund.

Upon the issuance and sale of bonds under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233, the State Bond Commission shall deposit the proceeds of any such sale or sales in a special fund created in the State Treasury to be known as the “Juvenile Justice Assistance Fund.” The proceeds of such bonds shall be used solely for the purposes provided in Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233, including the costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds. The costs incident to the issuance and sale of such bonds shall be disbursed by warrant upon requisition of the State Bond Commission, signed by the chairman of the commission. The remaining moneys in the fund shall be expended solely under the direction of the Department of Finance and Administration under such restrictions, if any, as may be contained in the resolution providing for the issuance of the bonds, and such funds shall be paid by the State Treasurer upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-223.
Further proceedings not required to issue bonds.

The bonds authorized under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 may be issued without any other proceedings or the happening of any other conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions and things that are specified or required by Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233. Any resolution providing for the issuance of bonds under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 shall become effective immediately upon its adoption by the State Bond Commission, and any such resolution may be adopted at any regular or special meeting of the State Bond Commission by a majority of its members.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-225.
Validation of bonds.

The bonds authorized under the authority of Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 may be validated in the Chancery Court of the First Judicial District of Hinds County, Mississippi, in the manner and with the force and effect provided by Chapter 13, Title 31, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the validation of county, municipal, school district and other bonds. The notice to taxpayers required by such statutes shall be published in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the City of Jackson, Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 13, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-227.
Actions to protect and enforce rights of bond holders.

Any holder of bonds issued under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 or of any of the interest coupons pertaining to the bonds may, either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce all rights granted under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233, or under such resolution, and may enforce and compel performance of all duties required by Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 to be performed, in order to provide for the payment of bonds and interest on the bonds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 14, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-229.
Bonds as legal investments.

All bonds issued under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 shall be legal investments for trustees and other fiduciaries, and for savings banks, trust companies and insurance companies organized under the laws of the State of Mississippi, and such bonds shall be legal securities that may be deposited with and shall be received by all public officers and bodies of this state and all municipalities and political subdivisions for the purpose of securing the deposit of public funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 15, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-231.
Bonds and income therefrom exempt from taxation.

Bonds issued under Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 and income from the bonds shall be exempt from all taxation in the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).

§ 43-27-233.
Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 as full and complete authority for exercise of powers granted.

Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 shall be deemed to be full and complete authority for the exercise of the powers granted, but Sections 43-27-207 through 43-27-233 shall not be deemed to repeal or to be in derogation of any existing law of this state.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1994, ch. 652, § 17, eff from and after passage (approved April 8, 1994).